Washington statutes.
RCW 18.76.070

Immunity from liability.

(1) No act done or omitted in good faith while performing duties as a poison center medical director or poison information specialist of a poison information center shall impose any liability on the poison center, its officers, the poison center medical director, the poison information specialist, or other employees.

(2) This section:

(a) Applies only to acts or omissions committed or omitted in the performance of duties which are within the area of responsibility and expertise of the poison center medical director or poison information specialist.

(b) Does not relieve the poison center or any person from any duty imposed by law for the designation or training of a person certified under this chapter.

(c) Does not apply to any act or omission which constitutes gross negligence or wilful or wanton conduct.

[ 1987 c 214 s 22.]